Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 4

Miscellaneous Provisions

44-17-401. Electronic locating collars.

No agency or entity of state or local government shall enact, adopt, promulgate, or enforce any law, ordinance, rule, regulation, or other policy that restricts or prevents the owner of any dog from using an electronic locating collar to protect the dog from loss; except that the fish and wildlife commission may limit the use of electronic locating collars through the promulgation of rules and regulations when required for the proper management of wildlife species.

Acts 1996, ch. 789, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 6.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “fish and wildlife commission” for “wildlife resources commission”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 14. June 30, 2012.

44-17-402. Retrieval of hunting dogs from federal property operated by wildlife resources agency.

If the owner or a person in control of a dog is hunting with either a firearm or a bow and arrow, and that person's dog strays onto property owned by the federal government and operated by the Tennessee wildlife resources agency, the owner or person may proceed onto the property without the person's firearm or bow and arrow. The person shall not be liable for any criminal sanction related to the pursuit of the dog. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to grant civil immunity to the owner or the person in control of the dog for any personal injury or property damage caused by the dog.

Acts 1996, ch. 789, § 2.

44-17-403. Death of pet caused by negligent act of another — Damages.

If a person's pet is killed or sustains injuries that result in death caused by the unlawful and intentional, or negligent, act of another or the animal of another, the trier of fact may find the individual causing the death or the owner of the animal causing the death liable for up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) in noneconomic damages; provided, that if the death is caused by the negligent act of another, the death or fatal injury must occur on the property of the deceased pet's owner or caretaker, or while under the control and supervision of the deceased pet's owner or caretaker.

If an unlawful act resulted in the death or permanent disability of a person's guide dog, then the value of the guide dog shall include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, both the cost of the guide dog as well as the cost of any specialized training the guide dog received.

As used in this section, “pet” means any domesticated dog or cat normally maintained in or near the household of its owner.

Limits for noneconomic damages set out in subsection (a) shall not apply to causes of action for intentional infliction of emotional distress or any other civil action other than the direct and sole loss of a pet.

Noneconomic damages awarded pursuant to this section shall be limited to compensation for the loss of the reasonably expected society, companionship, love and affection of the pet.

This section shall not apply to any not-for-profit entity or governmental agency, or its employees, negligently causing the death of a pet while acting on the behalf of public health or animal welfare; to any killing of a dog that has been or was killing or worrying livestock as in § 44-17-203; nor shall this section be construed to authorize any award of noneconomic damages in an action for professional negligence against a licensed veterinarian.

Acts 2000, ch. 762, § 1; 2004, ch. 940, § 4; 2004, ch. 957, §§ 5, 6, 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 762, § 2, provided that this section shall be known and may be cited as the “T-Bo Act.”

Acts 2000, ch. 762, § 4, provided that this section shall apply to any fatal injury sustained on or after May 22, 2000.

Acts 2004, ch. 940, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “General Patton Act of 2003”.

Acts 2004, ch. 940, § 8 provided that the provisions of this act shall not apply to any animal while that animal is being used for training, for an occupational purpose, or for hunting.

Law Reviews.

Animal Consortium, 84 Tenn. L.Rev. 893 (2017).

44-17-404. Recovery for death or injury to guide dogs.

If a person's guide dog is killed or sustains injuries that result in death or permanent disability caused by the unlawful and intentional, or negligent, act of another or the animal of another, then the trier of fact may find the individual causing the death or the owner of the animal causing the death liable for economic damages, which shall include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, both the cost of the guide dog as well as the cost of any specialized training the guide dog received.

Acts 2004, ch. 957, § 3.

Cross-References. Actions deemed theft of guide dogs, §39-14-208.

Aggravated cruelty to animals, §39-14-212.